Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-607
Collaboration, defined.

Collaboration means a process and relationship in which a certified nurse midwife works together with other health professionals to deliver health care within the scope of practice of certified nurse midwifery as provided in the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act. The collaborative relationship between the physician and the nurse midwife shall be subject to the control and regulation of the board.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 84;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1747;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 219.